Hawaii statutes.
§414D-279 Resignation of registered agent
of foreign corporation. The registered agent of a foreign corporation may
resign as agent by complying with the requirements of section 425R-10. [L 2001,
c 105, pt of §1; am L 2009, c 55, §26]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next